Illinois, session 104th, SB4010.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 16-128 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/16-128)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 16-128)7    Sec. 16-128. Creditable service; required service - 8required contributions. 9    (a) In order to receive the creditable service specified 10under subsection (b) of Section 16-127, a member is required 11to make the following contributions: (i) an amount equal to 12the contributions which would have been required had such 13service been rendered as a member under this System; (ii) for 14military service not immediately following employment and for 15service established under subdivision (b)(10) of Section 1616-127, an amount determined by the Board to be equal to the 17employer's normal cost of the benefits accrued for such 18service; and (iii) interest from the date the contributions 19would have been due (or, in the case of a person establishing 20credit for military service under subdivision (b)(3) of 21Section 16-127, the date of first membership in the System, if 22that date is later) to the date of payment, at the following 23rate of interest, compounded annually: for periods prior to   SB4010 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18687 RPS 32130 b1July 1, 1965, regular interest; from July 1, 1965 to June 30, 21977, 4% per year; on and after July 1, 1977, regular interest.3    (b) In order to receive creditable service under paragraph 4(2) of subsection (b) of Section 16-127 for those who were not 5members on June 30, 1963, the minimum required contribution 6shall be $420 per year of service together with interest at 4% 7per year compounded annually from July 1, preceding the date 8of membership until June 30, 1977 and at regular interest 9compounded annually thereafter to the date of payment.10    (c) In determining the contribution required in order to 11receive creditable service under paragraph (3) of subsection 12(b) of Section 16-127, the salary rate for the remainder of the 13school term in which a member enters military service shall be 14assumed to be equal to the member's salary rate at the time of 15entering military service. However, for military service not 16immediately following employment, the salary rate on the last 17date as a participating teacher prior to such military 18service, or on the first date as a participating teacher after 19such military service, whichever is greater, shall be assumed 20to be equal to the member's salary rate at the time of entering 21military service. For each school term thereafter, the 22member's salary rate shall be assumed to be 5% higher than the 23salary rate in the previous school term.24    (d) In determining the contribution required in order to 25receive creditable service under paragraph (5) of subsection 26(b) of Section 16-127, a member's salary rate during the   SB4010 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18687 RPS 32130 b1period for which credit is being established shall be assumed 2to be equal to the member's last salary rate immediately 3preceding that period.4    (d-5) For each year of service credit to be established 5under subsection (b-1) of Section 16-127, a member is required 6to contribute to the System (i) the employee and employer 7contribution that would have been required had such service 8been rendered as a member based on the annual salary rate 9during the first year of full-time employment as a teacher 10under this Article following the private or parochial school 11service, plus (ii) regular interest thereon at the actuarially 12assumed rate from the date of first full-time employment as a 13teacher under this Article following the private or parochial 14school service to the date of payment, compounded annually, at 15a rate determined by the Board. 16    (d-10) For service credit established under paragraph (6) 17of subsection (b) of Section 16-127 for days granted by an 18employer in excess of the member's normal annual sick leave 19allotment, the employer is required to pay the normal cost of 20benefits based upon such service credit. This subsection 21(d-10) does not apply to sick leave granted to teachers under 22contracts or collective bargaining agreements entered into, 23amended, or renewed before June 1, 2005 (the effective date of 24Public Act 94-4). The employer contributions required under 25this subsection (d-10) shall be paid in the form of a lump sum 26within 30 days after receipt of the bill after the teacher   SB4010 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18687 RPS 32130 b1begins receiving benefits under this Article. 2    (e) Except for contributions under subsection (d-10), the 3contributions required under this Section may be made from the 4date the statement for such creditable service is issued until 5retirement date. All such required contributions must be made 6before any retirement annuity is granted.7(Source: P.A. 96-546, eff. 8-17-09.)